Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1636SS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 169 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 498.38 Financial records access. 1 An association that provides utility service to its 2 members shall, upon reasonable request by any member of the 3 association, provide to the member the associationâs most 4 recent biennial report and any requested financial information, 5 including the associationâs budget and balance sheet. The 6 requested information shall be delivered to the member no later 7 than thirty days after the request. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 499.81 Financial records access. 9 An association that provides utility service to its 10 members shall, upon reasonable request by any member of the 11 association, provide to the member the associationâs most 12 recent biennial report and any requested financial information, 13 including the associationâs budget and balance sheet. The 14 requested information shall be delivered to the member no later 15 than thirty days after the request. 16